Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 6

Signal Lights

54-5-601. Maintenance of signal light on state highway without commissioner's approval — Misdemeanor.

Any person who installs or maintains a signal light on a state highway without having secured prior written approval of the commissioner commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 21, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-559; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-5-602. Signal light declared public nuisance.

A signal light installed and maintained on a state highway without the authority of the commissioner is declared a public nuisance that may be abated by the employees of the department at the direction of the commissioner or, upon the commissioner's request, by any peace officer, or by civil actions or suits brought in the circuit or chancery courts as provided by the general law.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 21, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-560; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Attorney General Opinions. A county attorney may bring an action under the statute to abate a nuisance, OAG 01-166 (11/15/01).

54-5-603. Inapplicable within boundaries of municipal corporation.

This part shall not apply within the boundaries of municipal corporations.

Acts 1961, ch. 21, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-561.